test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-korka_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.

  Noun - корка: # Noun  корка 'eng /udm /fin' - full paradigm
     корка+N+Sg+Nom: корка
     корка+N+Sg+Acc: коркаэз
#     корка+N+Sg+Acc+Dial/North: коркаты
     корка+N+Sg+Gen: коркалэн
     корка+N+Sg+Abl: коркалэсь
     корка+N+Sg+Dat: коркалы
     корка+N+Sg+Ins: коркаэн
     корка+N+Sg+Abe: коркатэк
     корка+N+Sg+Advl: коркаъя
     корка+N+Sg+Ine: коркаын
     корка+N+Sg+Ill: коркаэ
     корка+N+Sg+Ela: коркаысь
     корка+N+Sg+Egr: коркаысен
     корка+N+Sg+Ter: коркаозь
     корка+N+Sg+Prl: коркаэтӥ
     корка+N+Sg+Apr: коркалань

     корка+N+Pl+Nom: коркаос
     корка+N+Pl+Acc: коркаосыз
     корка+N+Pl+Gen: коркаослэн
     корка+N+Pl+Abl: коркаослэсь
     корка+N+Pl+Dat: коркаослы
     корка+N+Pl+Ins: коркаосэн
     корка+N+Pl+Abe: коркаостэк
     корка+N+Pl+Advl: коркаосъя
     корка+N+Pl+Ine: коркаосын
     корка+N+Pl+Ill: коркаосы
     корка+N+Pl+Ela: коркаосысь
     корка+N+Pl+Egr: коркаосысен
     корка+N+Pl+Ter: коркаосозь
     корка+N+Pl+Prl: коркаосэтӥ
     корка+N+Pl+Apr: коркаослань

     # possessive, and Cx-Px / Px-Cx

     корка+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: коркаэ
     корка+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: коркаэд
     корка+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: коркаэз
     корка+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: коркамы
     корка+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: коркаты
     корка+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: коркасы

     корка+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: коркаосы
     корка+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: коркаосыд
     корка+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: коркаосыз
     корка+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: коркаосмы
     корка+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: коркаосты
     корка+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: коркаоссы

     корка+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: коркаме
     корка+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: коркатэ
     корка+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: коркасэ
     корка+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: коркамес
     корка+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: коркатэс
     корка+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: коркасэс

     корка+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: коркаосме
     корка+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: коркаостэ
     корка+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: коркаоссэ
     корка+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: коркаосмес
     корка+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: коркаостэс
     корка+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: коркаоссэс

     корка+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: коркаэлэн
     корка+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: коркаэдлэн
     корка+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: коркаэзлэн
     корка+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: коркамылэн
     корка+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: коркатылэн
     корка+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: коркасылэн

     корка+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: коркаосылэн
     корка+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: коркаосыдлэн
     корка+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: коркаосызлэн
     корка+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: коркаосмылэн
     корка+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: коркаостылэн
     корка+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: коркаоссылэн

     корка+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: коркаэлэсь
     корка+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: коркаэдлэсь
     корка+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: коркаэзлэсь
     корка+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: коркамылэсь
     корка+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: коркатылэсь
     корка+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: коркасылэсь

     корка+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: коркаосылэсь
     корка+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: коркаосыдлэсь
     корка+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: коркаосызлэсь
     корка+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: коркаосмылэсь
     корка+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: коркаостылэсь
     корка+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: коркаоссылэсь

     корка+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: коркаэлы
     корка+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: коркаэдлы
     корка+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: коркаэзлы
     корка+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: коркамылы
     корка+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: коркатылы
     корка+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: коркасылы

     корка+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: коркаосылы
     корка+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: коркаосыдлы
     корка+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: коркаосызлы
     корка+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: коркаосмылы
     корка+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: коркаостылы
     корка+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: коркаоссылы

     корка+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: коркаэным
     корка+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: коркаэныд
     корка+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: коркаэныз
     корка+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: коркаэнымы
     корка+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: коркаэныды
     корка+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: коркаэнызы

     корка+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg1: коркаосыным
     корка+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: коркаосыныд
     корка+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: коркаосыныз
     корка+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: коркаосынымы
     корка+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: коркаосыныды
     корка+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: коркаосынызы

     корка+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: коркаэтэк
     корка+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: коркаэдтэк
     корка+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: коркаэзтэк
     корка+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: коркамытэк
     корка+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: коркатытэк
     корка+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: коркасытэк

     корка+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: коркаосытэк
     корка+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: коркаосыдтэк
     корка+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: коркаосызтэк
     корка+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: коркаосмытэк
     корка+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: коркаостытэк
     корка+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: коркаоссытэк

     корка+N+Sg+Advl+PxSg1: коркаэя
     корка+N+Sg+Advl+PxSg2: коркаэдъя
     корка+N+Sg+Advl+PxSg3: коркаэзъя
     корка+N+Sg+Advl+PxPl1: коркамыя
     корка+N+Sg+Advl+PxPl2: коркатыя
     корка+N+Sg+Advl+PxPl3: коркасыя

     корка+N+Pl+Advl+PxSg1: коркаосыя
     корка+N+Pl+Advl+PxSg2: коркаосыдъя
     корка+N+Pl+Advl+PxSg3: коркаосызъя
     корка+N+Pl+Advl+PxPl1: коркаосмыя
     корка+N+Pl+Advl+PxPl2: коркаостыя
     корка+N+Pl+Advl+PxPl3: коркаоссыя

     корка+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: коркаам
     корка+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: коркаад
     корка+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: коркааз
     корка+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: коркаамы
     корка+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: коркаады
     корка+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: коркаазы

     корка+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: коркаосам
     корка+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: коркаосад
     корка+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: коркаосаз
     корка+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: коркаосамы
     корка+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: коркаосады
     корка+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: коркаосазы

     корка+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: коркаам
     корка+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: коркаад
     корка+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: коркааз
     корка+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: коркаамы
     корка+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: коркаады
     корка+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: коркаазы

     корка+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: коркаосам
     корка+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: коркаосад
     корка+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: коркаосаз
     корка+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: коркаосамы
     корка+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: коркаосады
     корка+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: коркаосазы

     корка+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: коркаысьтым
     корка+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: коркаысьтыд
     корка+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: коркаысьтыз
     корка+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: коркаысьтымы
     корка+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: коркаысьтыды
     корка+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: коркаысьтызы

     корка+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: коркаосысьтым
     корка+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: коркаосысьтыд
     корка+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: коркаосысьтыз
     корка+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: коркаосысьтымы
     корка+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: коркаосысьтыды
     корка+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: коркаосысьтызы

     корка+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: коркаысеным
     корка+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: коркаысеныд
     корка+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: коркаысеныз
     корка+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: коркаысенымы
     корка+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: коркаысеныды
     корка+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: коркаысенызы

     корка+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: коркаосысеным
     корка+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: коркаосысеныд
     корка+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: коркаосысеныз
     корка+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: коркаосысенымы
     корка+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: коркаосысеныды
     корка+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: коркаосысенызы

     корка+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg1: коркаозям
     корка+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg2: коркаозяд
     корка+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg3: коркаозяз
     корка+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl1: [коркаозямы, коркамыозь]
     корка+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl2: [коркаозяды, коркатыозь]
     корка+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl3: [коркаозязы, коркасыозь]

     корка+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg1: коркаосозям
     корка+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg2: коркаосозяд
     корка+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg3: коркаосозяз
     корка+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl1: коркаосмыозь
     корка+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl2: коркаостыозь
     корка+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl3: коркаоссыозь

     корка+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg1: коркаэтӥм
     корка+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: коркаэтӥд
     корка+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: коркаэтӥз
     корка+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: коркаэтӥмы
     корка+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: коркаэтӥды
     корка+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: коркаэтӥзы

     корка+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg1: коркаосэтӥм
     корка+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: коркаосэтӥд
     корка+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: коркаосэтӥз
     корка+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: коркаосэтӥмы
     корка+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: коркаосэтӥды
     корка+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: коркаосэтӥзы

     корка+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg1: коркаэлань
     корка+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: коркаэдлань
     корка+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: коркаэзлань
     корка+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: коркамылань
     корка+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl2: коркатылань
     корка+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: коркасылань

     корка+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg1: коркаосэлань
     корка+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: коркаосэдлань
     корка+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: коркаосэзлань
     корка+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: коркаосмылань
     корка+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl2: коркаостылань
     корка+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: коркаоссылань
